Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-4403
Veterinarian; vaccination for rabies; certificate; contents.

It shall be the duty of each veterinarian, at the time of vaccinating any domestic or hybrid animal, to complete a certificate of rabies vaccination which shall include, but not be limited to, the following information:

(1) The owner's name and address;

(2) An adequate description of the domestic or hybrid animal, including, but not limited to, such items as the domestic or hybrid animal's breed, sex, age, name, and distinctive markings;

(3) The date of vaccination;

(4) The rabies vaccination tag number;

(5) The type of rabies vaccine administered by dosage and number of years of effectiveness;

(6) The manufacturer's serial number of the vaccine used; and

(7) The date by which the next vaccination is due.

Such veterinarian shall issue a tag with the certificate of vaccination.

Laws 1969, c. 445, § 3, p. 1485;

Laws 1987, LB 104, § 3;

Laws 2007, LB25, § 5;

Laws 2019, LB61, § 3.